Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 12
IN-HOME SUPPORT SERVICES

25.5-6-1201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that there may be a more effective way to deliver home- and community-based services to the elderly, blind, and disabled; to disabled children; and to persons with spinal cord injuries, that allows for more self-direction in their care and a cost savings to the state. The general assembly also finds that every person that is currently receiving home- and community-based services does not need the same level of supervision and care from a licensed health-care professional in order to meet his or her care needs and remain living in the community. The general assembly, therefore, declares that it is beneficial to the elderly, blind, and disabled clients of home- and community-based services, to clients of the disabled children care program, and to clients enrolled in the spinal cord injury waiver pilot program, for the state department to develop a service that would allow these people to receive in-home support.

The general assembly further finds that allowing clients more self-direction in their care is a more effective way to deliver home- and community-based services to clients with major mental health disorders and brain injuries, as well as to clients receiving home- and community-based supportive living services and children's extensive support services. Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is appropriate for the state department to develop a plan for expanding the availability of in-home support services to include these clients.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1970, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1358), ch. 255, p. 1017, § 2, effective August 6; entire section amended, (HB 14-1357), ch. 254, p. 1013, § 1, effective March 1, 2015.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 389, § 32, effective August 8.

25.5-6-1202. Definitions.

As used in this part 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Attendant" means a person who is directly employed by an in-home support service agency to provide, or a family member, including a spouse, providing, in-home support services to eligible persons.

"Authorized representative" means an individual designated by the eligible person receiving services, or by the parent or guardian of the eligible person receiving services, if appropriate, who has the judgment and ability to assist the eligible person receiving services in acquiring and utilizing services under this part 12. The extent of the authorized representative's involvement shall be determined upon designation. The authorized representative shall not be the eligible person's service provider.

"Eligible person" means any person who:

Is enrolled in a home- and community-based services waiver program pursuant to this article 6 for which in-home support services are authorized pursuant to state and federal law;

Is willing to participate;

Obtains a statement from his or her primary care physician indicating that the person has sound judgment and the ability to direct his or her care, the eligible child's parent or guardian has sound judgment and the ability to direct the eligible child's care, or the person has an authorized representative; and

Meets any other qualifications established by the state board by rule.

"Health maintenance activities" means health-related tasks as defined in rule by the state board and include, but are not limited to, catheter irrigation; administration of medication, enemas, and suppositories; and wound care.

"In-home support service agency" means an agency that is certified by the state department and provides independent living core services as defined in section 8-85-102 (6), C.R.S., and in-home support services.

"In-home support services" means services that are provided in the home and in the community by an attendant under the direction of the eligible person or the eligible person's authorized representative including health maintenance activities and support for activities of daily living or instrumental activities of daily living, and personal care services and homemaker services as defined in rules promulgated by the medical services board pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1970, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 14-1358), ch. 255, p. 1018, § 3, effective August 6; (1), (3)(a), and (6) amended, (HB 14-1357), ch. 254, p. 1014, § 2, effective March 1, 2015.

L. 2015:

(5) amended, (SB 15-240), ch. 139, p. 423, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(5) amended, (SB 16-093), ch. 54, p. 132, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 19-164), ch. 371, p. 3386, § 3, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-1402 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this part 12, see § 25.5-4-103.

25.5-6-1203. In-home support services - eligibility - licensure exclusion - in-home support service agency responsibilities - rules.

The state department shall offer in-home support services as an option for eligible persons who receive home- and community-based services. In-home support services shall be provided to eligible persons. The state department shall seek any federal authorization that may be necessary to implement this part 12. The state department shall design and implement in-home support services with input from consumers of home- and community-based services and independent living centers and home- and community-based service providers.

(1.5) Repealed.

An eligible person receiving in-home support services or the eligible person's authorized representative or parent or guardian shall be allowed to:

Choose the eligible person's in-home support service agency or the eligible person's attendant; and

Direct the eligible person's care, including directly scheduling, managing, and supervising the attendant, and determine the level of in-home support services agency support.

Sections 12-255-104 (7), (8.5), and (11), 12-255-125 (1), and 12-255-214 (1)(b) shall not apply to a person who is directly employed by an in-home support service agency to provide in-home support services and who is acting within the scope and course of such employment or is a family member providing in-home support services pursuant to this part 12. However, such person may not represent himself or herself to the public as a licensed nurse, a certified nurse aide, a licensed practical or professional nurse, a registered nurse, or a registered professional nurse. This exclusion shall not apply to any person who has had his or her license as a nurse or certification as a nurse aide suspended or revoked or his or her application for such license or certification denied.

In-home support service agencies providing in-home support services shall provide twenty-four-hour back-up services to their clients. In-home support service agencies shall either contract with or have on staff a state licensed health-care professional, as defined by the state board by rule, acting within the scope of the person's profession. The state board shall promulgate rules setting forth the training requirements for attendants providing in-home support services and the oversight and monitoring responsibilities of the state licensed health-care professional that is either contracting with or is on staff with the in-home support service agency. The state board rules must allow the eligible person or the eligible person's authorized representative, parent of a minor, or guardian to determine, in conjunction with the in-home support services agency, the amount of oversight needed in connection with the eligible person's in-home support services.

The state board shall promulgate rules that establish how an in-home support service agency can discontinue a client under this part 12. The rules shall establish that a client can only be involuntarily discontinued when equivalent care in the community has been secured or that a client can be discontinued after exhibiting documented prohibited behavior involving attendants, including abuse of attendants, and that dispute resolution has failed. The determination of whether an in-home support service agency has made adequate attempts at resolution shall be made by the state department.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The single entry point agencies established in section 25.5-6-106 shall be responsible for determining a person's eligibility for in-home support services; except that for eligible disabled children the state department shall designate the entity that will determine the child's eligibility. The state board shall promulgate rules specifying the single entry point agencies' responsibilities under this part 12. At a minimum, these rules shall require that case managers discuss the option and potential benefits of in-home support services with all eligible long-term care clients.

(5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The case management agencies established in section 25.5-6-1703 shall be responsible for determining a person's eligibility for in-home support services; except that for eligible disabled children the state department shall designate the entity that will determine the child's eligibility. The state board shall promulgate rules specifying the case management agencies' responsibilities pursuant to this part 12. At a minimum, these rules must require that case managers discuss the option and potential benefits of in-home support services with all eligible long-term care clients.

Section 25.5-6-310 does not apply to a family member of an eligible person who provides in-home support services to the eligible person pursuant to this part 12. The state board shall promulgate rules, as necessary, to establish limits on reimbursement to family members.

In administering the provision of in-home support services pursuant to this part 12, the state department shall:

Implement a system for the routine and accurate monitoring of the number of persons receiving in-home support services; and

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (7)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Provide comprehensive, periodic training for all single entry point agencies in the state, which training shall include, at a minimum:

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (7)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Provide comprehensive, periodic training for all case management agencies in the state, which training shall include, at a minimum:

The current eligibility requirements for the receipt of in-home support services; and

The location of, and contact information for, the in-home support service agencies providing in-home support services in the state.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1971, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(7) added, (SB 11-105), ch. 277, p. 1244, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2014:

(1.5) added and (2), (4)(a), and (6) amended, (HB 14-1357), ch. 254, p. 1014, § 3, effective March 1, 2015.

L. 2019:

(1.5) repealed, (SB 19-164), ch. 371, p. 3386, § 4, effective August 2; (3) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1711, § 190, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(3) amended, (HB 20-1183), ch. 157, p. 703, § 62, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(5) and (7)(b) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 337, § 37, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-1403 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-1204. Provision of services - duties of state department - gifts - grants.

The provision of the in-home support services set forth in this part 12 shall be subject to the availability of federal matching medicaid funds, pursuant to Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, for payment of the costs for administration and the costs for the provision of such services.

The state department shall seek and utilize any available federal, state, or private funds that are available for carrying out the purposes of this part 12, including but not limited to medicaid funds, pursuant to Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

The executive director of the state department is authorized to accept and expend on behalf of the state any grants or gifts from any public or private source for the purpose of implementing this part 12.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1972, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-1404 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-1205. Accountability - rate structure - rules.

The state department shall develop the accountability requirements necessary to safeguard the use of public dollars and to promote effective and efficient service delivery under this part 12.

The state board, by rule, shall set a separate rate structure for in-home support services provided under this part 12.

The state board shall adopt rules as necessary for the implementation and administration of the in-home support services authorized by this part 12. At a minimum, the rules shall include certification of in-home support service agencies and standards of care for the provision of services under this part 12.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1972, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-1405 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-1206. Report.

The state department shall report annually to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committee, and the health and environment committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee, on the implementation of in-home support services. At a minimum the report shall include the cost-effectiveness of providing in-home support services to the elderly, blind, and disabled and to eligible disabled children, the number of persons receiving such services, and any strategies and resources that are available or that are necessary to assist more persons in staying in their homes through the use of in-home support services.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1973, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-105), ch. 277, p. 1244, § 2, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-1406 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-1207. Repeal of part.

This part 12 is repealed, effective September 1, 2028. Prior to such repeal, in-home support services established under this part 12 shall be reviewed as provided for in section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1973, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 323, § 3, effective April 7.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-105), ch. 277, p. 1245, § 3, effective June 2.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1358), ch. 255, p. 1018, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-164), ch. 371, p. 3385, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-1407 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-1208. Conditional repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1973, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-105), ch. 277, p. 1245, § 4, effective June 2; entire section repealed, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1169, § 69, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-1408 as it existed prior to 2006.